Nebraska, session 109, LB741.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 20-506, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-506 (1) The Racial Profiling Advisory Committee is created.
(2)(a) The committee shall consist of:
(i) The executive director of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice, who also shall be the chairperson of the committee;
(ii) The Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety or his or her
designee;
(iii) The director of the Commission on Latino-Americans or his or her
designee; and
(iv) The executive director of the Commission on Indian Affairs or his or
her designee; and .
(v) The chairperson of the Commission on African American Affairs or his
or her designee.
(b) The committee shall also consist of the following persons, each
appointed by the Governor from a list of five names submitted to the Governor
for each position:
(i) A representative of the Fraternal Order of Police;
(ii) A representative of the Nebraska County Sheriffs Association;
(iii) A representative of the Police Officers Association of Nebraska;
(iv) A representative of the American Civil Liberties Union of Nebraska;
(v) A representative of the AFL-CIO;
(vi) A representative of the Police Chiefs Association of Nebraska;
(vii) A representative of the Nebraska branches of the National
Association for the Advancement of Colored People; and
(viii) A representative of the Nebraska State Bar Association appointed by
the Governor from a list of attorneys submitted by the executive council of the
Nebraska State Bar Association.
(3) The committee shall meet and organize within thirty days after the
appointment of the members. The committee shall meet semiannually at a time and
place to be fixed by the committee. Special meetings may be called by the
chairperson or at the request of two or more members of the committee.
(4) The committee shall advise the commission and its executive director
in the conduct of their duties regarding (a) the completeness and acceptability
of written racial profiling prevention policies submitted by individual law
enforcement agencies as required by subsection (1) of section 20-504, (b) the
collection of data by law enforcement agencies, any needed additional data, and
any needed additional analysis, investigation, or inquiry as to the data
provided pursuant to subsection (3) of section 20-504, (c) the review,
analysis, inquiry, study, and recommendations required pursuant to subsection
(7) of section 20-504, including an analysis of the review, analysis, inquiry,
study, and recommendations, and (d) policy recommendations with respect to the
prevention of racial profiling and the need, if any, for enforcement by the
Department of Justice of the prohibitions found in section 20-502.
Sec. 2. Section 43-4202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-4202 (1) The Nebraska Children's Commission is created as a high-level
leadership body to monitor and evaluate the child welfare and juvenile justice
systems. The commission shall provide a permanent forum for collaboration among
state, local, community, public, and private stakeholders in child welfare and
juvenile justice programs and services.
(2)(a) The Governor shall appoint fifteen voting members. The members
appointed pursuant to this subdivision shall represent stakeholders in the
child welfare and juvenile justice systems and shall include: (i) A biological
parent currently or previously involved in the child welfare system or juvenile
justice system; (ii) a young adult previously in foster care; and (iii) a
representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe residing within the State
of Nebraska and appointed from a list of three nominees submitted by the
Commission on Indian Affairs; and (iv) one individual from a list of three
nominees submitted by the Commission on African American Affairs.
(b) The Nebraska Children's Commission shall have the following nonvoting,
ex officio members: (i) The chairperson of the Health and Human Services
Committee of the Legislature or a committee member designated by the
chairperson; (ii) the chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature
or a committee member designated by the chairperson; (iii) the chairperson of
the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature or a committee member
-1-

LB741 LB741
2026 2026
designated by the chairperson; (iv) three persons appointed by the State Court
Administrator; (v) the executive director of the Foster Care Review Office;
(vi) the Director of Children and Family Services of the Division of Children
and Family Services of the Department of Health and Human Services or his or
her designee; (vii) the Director of Behavioral Health of the Division of
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services or his or her
designee; (viii) the Commissioner of Education or his or her designee; and (ix)
the Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare.
(3) The nonvoting members may attend commission meetings and participate
in the discussions of the commission, provide information to the commission on
the policies, programs, and processes within their areas of expertise, and
gather information for the commission. The commission may hire staff to carry
out the responsibilities of the commission.
(4) For administrative purposes, the offices of the staff of the
commission shall be located in the Foster Care Review Office. The commission
may hire a consultant with experience in facilitating strategic planning to
provide neutral, independent assistance in updating the statewide strategic
plan.
(5) The commission, with assistance from the executive director of the
Foster Care Review Office, shall employ a policy analyst to provide research
and expertise to the commission relating to the child welfare system. The
policy analyst shall work in conjunction with the staff of the commission. His
or her responsibilities may include, but are not limited to: (a) Monitoring the
Nebraska child welfare system and juvenile justice system to provide
information to the commission; (b) analyzing child welfare and juvenile justice
public policy through research and literature reviews and drafting policy
reports when requested; (c) managing or leading projects or tasks and providing
resource support to commission members and committees as determined by the
chairperson of the commission; (d) serving as liaison among child welfare and
juvenile justice stakeholders and the public and responding to information
inquiries as required; and (e) other duties as assigned by the commission.
(6) Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for expenses as members
of such commission as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. No member of the
commission shall have any private financial interest, profit, or benefit from
any work of the commission.
(7) It is the intent of the Legislature to fund the operations of the
commission using the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund for fiscal years 2019-20
and 2020-21.
Sec. 3. Original section 20-506, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and section 43-4202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-2-